Utah statutes.
53A-25a-104.   Instruction in reading and writing of Braille.
(1)  Instruction in the reading and writing of Braille shall be sufficient to
enable each blind student to communicate effectively and efficiently with the
same level of proficiency expected of the student's peers of comparable
ability and grade level.
(2)  The student's IEP shall specify:
(a)  the results obtained from the skills assessment required under Section
53A-25a-103;
(b)  the manner in which Braille is to be implemented as a reading mode for
learning in other academic activities;
(c)  the date on which Braille instruction shall begin;
(d)  the length of the period of instruction and the frequency and duration of
each instructional session;
(e)  the projected level of competency in the reading and writing of Braille
to be achieved by the end of the IEP period and the objective assessment
measures to be used; and
(f)  if a decision has been made under Section 53A-25a-103 that Braille
instruction or use is not required for the student:
(i)  a statement that the decision was reached after fully complying with
Subsection 53A-25a-103(2); and
(ii)  a statement of the reasons for choosing another reading mode.
